Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-1403
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 8-1401, 8-1402, and 8-1404:

(1) Governmental agency means any agency, department, or commission
of this state or any authorized officer, employee, or agent of such agency,
department, or commission;

(2) Law enforcement agency means an agency or department of
this state or of any political subdivision of this state that obtains, serves,
and enforces arrest warrants or that conducts or engages in prosecutions for
violations of the law; and

(3) Person means any individual, corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, association, joint stock association, trust, unincorporated
organization, and any other legal entity.

Laws 2003, LB 156, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB788, § 6.